Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, and Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 20, to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriation listed under them is available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. Supplemental appropriations and reductions to appropriations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, are effective the day following final enactment. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,084,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bureau of Criminal Apprehension new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 484,000 new text end new text begin Certification of Ownership new text end new text begin To implement the certification of ownership requirement under Minnesota Statutes, section 624.7148. The base for this activity is $165,000 in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Office of Justice Programs new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 1,600,000 new text end new text begin (a) Public Awareness Campaign; Extreme Risk Protection Orders new text end new text begin $100,000 is for a public awareness campaign to increase awareness of and educate the public and law enforcement about extreme risk protection orders. The commissioner may contract with a private entity for the public awareness campaign. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Violence Prevention Project Research Center new text end new text begin $500,000 is to fund a violence prevention project research center that operates as a nonprofit, nonpartisan research center dedicated to reducing violence in society and using data and analysis to improve criminal justice-related policy and practice in Minnesota. The research center must place an emphasis on issues related to gun violence. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) Nonpublic Schools; Grants new text end new text begin $1,000,000 is for school safety grants to nonpublic schools. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to five percent of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end new text begin A nonpublic school may apply for a school safety grant in the form and manner determined by the commissioner of public safety. For purposes of this paragraph, "nonpublic school" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.41, subdivision 9, excluding a home school. new text end new text begin The commissioner must prioritize grant awards to nonpublic schools with lower fiscal capacity, according to criteria developed by the commissioner. The commissioner must accept grant applications until January 1, 2027. new text end new text begin The commissioner must make grant awards no later than March 1, 2027. new text end new text begin A nonpublic school that receives a grant under this paragraph must consult with the Minnesota School Safety Center for best practices on how to use the grant money. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2028, the commissioner must make a preliminary report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and public safety on the grants awarded to nonpublic schools under this paragraph. The report must detail the recipient, amount, and intended use of each grant. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2030, the commissioner must make a final report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and public safety on the grants awarded to nonpublic schools under this paragraph. The report must detail the recipient, amount, and reported use of each grant. new text end new text begin The reports must be filed according to Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end new text begin Grant money awarded under this paragraph may be used for any purpose authorized for the use of safe schools revenue under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.44, subdivision 4. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin HUMAN SERVICESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 34,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,675,000 new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin School-Linked Behavioral Health Grants new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 2,700,000 new text end new text begin For school-linked behavioral health grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4901. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Family Peer Specialist Start-Up Grants new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 385,000 new text end new text begin For start-up grants to develop certified family peer specialist services within existing children's mental health providers under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4889, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (18). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Mobile Crisis Grants new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 3,850,000 new text end new text begin For mobile crisis grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 245.4661, subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (15), and 245.4889, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (4). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Mental Health Grants for Health Care Professionals new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 1,930,000 new text end new text begin For mental health grants for health care professionals under Laws 2022, chapter 99, article 1, section 46, as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 4, section 94. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Mental Health Reimbursement Rate Increases new text end new text begin 34,000 new text end new text begin 5,810,000 new text end new text begin For mental health reimbursement rate increases under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.761. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin EDUCATIONnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 19,037,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Anonymous Reporting System new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 37,000 new text end new text begin For duties related to the anonymous reporting system requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 121A.036. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin School Safety Aid Program new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 19,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) School Safety Aid new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2027 only, the school safety aid for a school district, charter school, intermediate district or other cooperative unit, or American Indian Tribal contract school eligible for aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.83, equals $21.82 times the number of pupils enrolled in the school on October 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) Eligible Uses new text end new text begin Aid awarded under this subdivision may be used for any purpose authorized for the use of safe schools revenue under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.44, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (c) Administration new text end new text begin One hundred percent of the school safety aid must be paid in fiscal year 2027 on a schedule determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin For a charter school in the first year of operation, the commissioner of education must calculate aid under paragraph (a) using the school's enrollment for the current fiscal year. new text end new text begin (d) Appropriation new text end new text begin $19,000,000 is for school safety aid under paragraph (a). This is a onetime appropriation. new text end ARTICLE 2 SEMIAUTOMATIC MILITARY-STYLE ASSAULT WEAPONS AND LARGE- CAPACITY MAGAZINES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.712, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon. new text begin (a) new text end "Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon" means: (1) any of the following firearms: (i) Avtomat Kalashnikov (AK-47) semiautomatic rifle type; (ii) Beretta AR-70 and BM-59 semiautomatic rifle types; (iii) Colt AR-15 semiautomatic rifle type; (iv) Daewoo Max-1 and Max-2 semiautomatic rifle types; (v) Famas MAS semiautomatic rifle type; (vi) Fabrique Nationale FN-LAR and FN-FNC semiautomatic rifle types; (vii) Galil semiautomatic rifle type; (viii) Heckler & Koch HK-91, HK-93, and HK-94 semiautomatic rifle types; (ix) Ingram MAC-10 and MAC-11 semiautomatic pistol and carbine types; (x) Intratec TEC-9 semiautomatic pistol type; (xi) Sigarms SIG 550SP and SIG 551SP semiautomatic rifle types; (xii) SKS with detachable magazine semiautomatic rifle type; (xiii) Steyr AUG semiautomatic rifle type; (xiv) Street Sweeper and Striker-12 revolving-cylinder shotgun types; (xv) USAS-12 semiautomatic shotgun type; (xvi) Uzi semiautomatic pistol and carbine types; or (xvii) Valmet M76 and M78 semiautomatic rifle types; (2) any firearm that is another model made by the same manufacturer as one of the firearms listed in clause (1), and has the same action design as one of the listed firearms, and is a redesigned, renamed, or renumbered version of one of the firearms listed in clause (1), or has a slight modification or enhancement, including but not limited to a folding or retractable stock; adjustable sight; case deflector for left-handed shooters; shorter barrel; wooden, plastic, or metal stock; larger clip size; different caliber; or a bayonet mount; and (3) any firearm that has been manufactured or sold by another company under a licensing agreement with a manufacturer of one of the firearms listed in clause (1) entered into after the effective date of Laws 1993, chapter 326, to manufacture or sell firearms that are identical or nearly identical to those listed in clause (1), or described in clause (2), regardless of the company of production or country of origin. The weapons listed in clause (1), except those listed in items (iii), (ix), (x), (xiv), and (xv), are the weapons the importation of which was barred by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms of the United States Department of the Treasury in July 1989. deleted text begin Except as otherwise specifically provided in paragraph (d), a firearm is not a "semiautomatic military-style assault weapon" if it is generally recognized as particularly suitable for or readily adaptable to sporting purposes under United States Code, title 18, section 925, paragraph (d)(3), or any regulations adopted pursuant to that law. deleted text end new text begin (b) Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon also includes any: new text end new text begin (1) semiautomatic rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (iii) a folding or telescoping stock; or new text end new text begin (iv) a shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing the bearer to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being burned, but excluding a slide that encloses the barrel; new text end new text begin (2) semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (ii) a folding, telescoping, or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (iii) a shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing the bearer to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being burned, but excluding a slide that encloses the barrel; or new text end new text begin (iv) the capacity to accept a detachable magazine at any location outside of the pistol grip; new text end new text begin (3) semiautomatic shotgun that has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (iii) a folding or telescoping stock; new text end new text begin (iv) a fixed magazine capacity in excess of 17 rounds; or new text end new text begin (v) an ability to accept a detachable magazine; new text end new text begin (4) shotgun with a revolving cylinder; or new text end new text begin (5) conversion kit, part, or combination of parts from which an assault weapon can be assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person. new text end new text begin Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon does not mean any firearm described in this paragraph that has been made permanently inoperable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.712, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Large-capacity magazine. new text end new text begin "Large-capacity magazine" means any ammunition feeding device with the capacity to accept more than 17 rounds or any conversion kit, part, or combination of parts from which this type of device can be assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person. Large-capacity magazine does not mean any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) a feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 17 rounds; new text end new text begin (2) a .22 caliber tube ammunition feeding device; or new text end new text begin (3) a tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7131, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Federally licensed firearms dealers; applicability of this section. new text end new text begin A firearms dealer, as defined in section 624.7134, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), is prohibited from selling a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine under section 624.7135. The provisions of this section apply to dealers when transferring or selling a pistol. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Background check and evidence of identity. new text begin (a) new text end An unlicensed person is prohibited from transferring a pistol deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end semiautomatic military-style assault weaponnew text begin , or large-capacity magazinenew text end to any other unlicensed person, unless: (1) new text begin for the transfer of a pistol, new text end the transfer is made through a firearms dealer as provided for in subdivision 3; or (2) new text begin for the transfer of a pistol, semiautomatic military-style assault weapon, or large-capacity magazine, new text end the transferee presents a valid transferee permit issued under section 624.7131 and a current state or federally issued identification. new text begin (b) In addition to the requirements under paragraph (a), for the transfer of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine, the transferor must present proof that the transferor legally acquired the item before the date of the transfer and that it is properly certified by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. Proof that the item was legally acquired may be demonstrated by a sales receipt or other sufficient proof demonstrating that the transferor purchased the item before July 1, 2027, or legally acquired it by gift, transfer upon death, or other nonprohibited legal method of acquiring the item. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Record of transfer; required information. (a) Unless a transfer is made through a firearms dealer as provided for in subdivision 3, when two unlicensed persons complete the transfer of a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon, the transferor and transferee must complete a record of transfer on a form designed and made publicly available without fee for this purpose by the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. Each page of the record of transfer must be signed and dated by the transferor and the transferee and contain the serial number of the pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon. (b) The record of transfer must contain the following information: (1) a clear copy of each person's current state or federally issued identification; (2) a clear copy of the transferee permit presented by the transferee; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (3) for a transfer of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine, a clear copy of the item's certification by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension and the proof described in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), that the item was legally acquired by the transferor before the date of transfer; and new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4) new text end a signed statement by the transferee swearing that the transferee is not currently prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm. (c) new text begin For a transfer of a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon, new text end the record of transfer must also contain the following information regarding the transferred deleted text begin pistol or semiautomatic military-style assaultdeleted text end weapon: (1) the type of pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon; (2) the manufacturer, make, and model of the pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon; and (3) the pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon's manufacturer-assigned serial number. new text begin (d) For a transfer of a large-capacity magazine, the record of transfer must contain detailed information on the item including, if applicable, the manufacturer, make, and model; the capacity; the caliber of ammunition the item accepts; the type of firearm the item is to be used with; and any serial number or other unique identifier. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e) new text end Both the transferor and the transferee must retain a copy of the record of transfer and any attachments to the record of transfer for 10 years from the date of the transfer. A copy in digital form shall be acceptable for the purposes of this paragraph. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [624.7135] SALES OF SEMIAUTOMATIC MILITARY-STYLE ASSAULT WEAPONS AND LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Certain sales prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a firearms dealer, as defined in section 624.7134, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), may not sell a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or a large-capacity magazine. new text end new text begin (b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an unlicensed person, as defined in section 624.7134, subdivision 1, paragraph (d), may sell a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine to another unlicensed person only as provided in section 624.7134. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a person who violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if the person violates paragraph (a) by selling any combination of semiautomatic military-style assault weapons or large-capacity magazines totaling more than ten within a 180-day period. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exclusions. new text end new text begin This section shall not apply to the following: new text end new text begin (1) a sale to a firearms dealer as defined in section 624.7134, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (2) a sale to any law enforcement agency; new text end new text begin (3) to the extent the purchaser is acting within the course and scope of employment and official duties, a sale to: new text end new text begin (i) a peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (ii) a member of the United States armed forces, the National Guard, or the Reserves of the United States armed forces; new text end new text begin (iii) a federal law enforcement officer; or new text end new text begin (iv) a security guard employed by a protective agent licensed pursuant to chapter 326; new text end new text begin (4) a sale to an immediate family member. For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a spouse, domestic partner, parent, child, sibling, grandparent, or grandchild; new text end new text begin (5) a sale of an antique firearm as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (6) a sale of a curio or relic as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, section 478.11, if the transfer is between collectors of firearms as curios or relics as defined in United States Code, title 18, section 921(a)(13), who each have in their possession a valid collector of curio and relics license issued by the United States Department of Justice, Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; or new text end new text begin (7) any gift, transfer at death, or temporary transfer or loan for less than 30 days, where no remuneration or consideration is given or received. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [624.7148] CERTIFICATION OF SEMIAUTOMATIC MILITARY-STYLE ASSAULT WEAPONS AND LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin It is unlawful for a person to own or possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine that is not certified as required under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certification of ownership of semiautomatic military-style assault weapons and large-capacity magazines. new text end new text begin (a) A person who owns or possesses a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine must request certification of ownership from the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension must provide the person with a duplicate copy of their request for certification. new text end new text begin (b) A person described in paragraph (a) must renew the certification of ownership every three years. new text end new text begin (c) Semiautomatic military-style assault weapons and large-capacity magazines may be transferred only as provided in sections 624.7134 and 624.7135. new text end new text begin (d) The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension may charge a fee for each certification and certification renewal pursuant to this subdivision. new text end new text begin (e) Persons lawfully acquiring semiautomatic military-style assault weapons or large-capacity magazines must, within 120 days of acquiring title, request certification of ownership of the device from the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. new text end new text begin (f) The superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension must implement a certification system. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A person who owns or possesses an uncertified semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine or who otherwise knowingly violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation is guilty of a felony. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding sections 609.035 and 609.04, a prosecution or conviction for violation of this section is not a bar to conviction of, or punishment for, any other crime. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Data practices. new text end new text begin Data on individuals collected, created, received, maintained, or disseminated under this section by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension is classified as private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) any person who is a government officer, agent, or employee; member of the armed forces of the United States; or peace officer, but only to the extent that the person is otherwise authorized to own or possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or large-capacity magazine while acting within the scope of the person's duties; new text end new text begin (2) a firearms manufacturer that is properly licensed under applicable laws; or new text end new text begin (3) a firearms dealer that is properly licensed under applicable laws. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), this section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end new text begin (b) The provisions of this section requiring the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension to implement a certification system are effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 3 OTHER FIREARMS PROVISIONS Section 1. new text begin [121A.036] ANONYMOUS THREAT REPORTING SYSTEM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition; evidence-based. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "evidence-based" means a program or practice that: new text end new text begin (1) demonstrates a statistically significant effect on relevant outcomes based on: new text end new text begin (i) strong evidence from at least one well-designed and well-implemented experimental study; new text end new text begin (ii) moderate evidence from at least one well-designed and well-implemented quasi-experimental study; or new text end new text begin (iii) promising evidence from at least one well-designed and well-implemented correlational study with statistical controls for selection bias; or new text end new text begin (2) demonstrates a rationale based on high-quality research findings or positive evaluation that the program or practice is likely to improve relevant outcomes, and includes ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the program or practice. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Local anonymous threat reporting system. new text end new text begin (a) A school district or charter school is encouraged to implement a local anonymous threat reporting system. A local anonymous threat reporting system must: new text end new text begin (1) support anonymous reporting 24 hours a day using a mobile application and a multilingual crisis center at a minimum; new text end new text begin (2) include crisis centers staffed by persons with evidence-based counseling and crisis intervention training; new text end new text begin (3) promptly forward reported information to the appropriate school-based team; new text end new text begin (4) support a coordinated response by schools, 911 telecommunicators, and sworn law enforcement to an identified crisis when response by schools and sworn law enforcement is to be reasonably expected to ensure public safety and welfare; new text end new text begin (5) require and certify the training of a school-based team in each school to receive notice of any report submitted through the anonymous threat reporting system concerning the school, school personnel, or an enrolled student; new text end new text begin (6) promote public awareness and education about the anonymous threat reporting system and reporting methods before launching the system; new text end new text begin (7) implement an evidence-based student violence prevention training that teaches students how to identify observable warning signs and signals of an individual who may be at risk of self-harm, the importance of taking threats seriously and seeking help, and how to use the anonymous threat reporting system to report a person who is at risk of self-harm; and new text end new text begin (8) comply with data practices under chapter 13 and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, United States Code, title 20, section 1232g. new text end new text begin (b) A school that implements its own system may enter into a contract to develop and implement an anonymous threat reporting system that meets the requirements of this subdivision. new text end new text begin (c) In addition to the system requirements under paragraph (a), a third party providing a local anonymous threat reporting system to a school must establish: new text end new text begin (1) a website to educate students on the availability of the anonymous threat reporting system and provide guidance on how and when to use the system; and new text end new text begin (2) a toll-free hotline that can be used to provide anonymous tips regarding dangerous, violent, threatening, harmful, or potentially harmful activity that occurs or is threatened on school property or relates to an enrolled student or school personnel. new text end new text begin (d) A district or charter school that establishes a local anonymous threat reporting system must form a school-based team at each school site comprised of at least three school employees. new text end new text begin (e) A nonpublic school may implement a local anonymous threat reporting system but is not subject to the requirements of this subdivision. new text end new text begin (f) A district or charter school must report the following information to the Department of Education, in the form and manner determined by the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) whether the district or charter school has implemented a local anonymous threat reporting system, and if so: new text end new text begin (i) the third party that provided the system; new text end new text begin (ii) contact information for each school-based team; and new text end new text begin (iii) the number of reports received through the local anonymous threat reporting system, how the reports were received, and the number of false reports received; and new text end new text begin (2) whether the district or charter school has notified students, families, employees, and community members with information about the statewide anonymous threat reporting system under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (g) A school district or charter school that issues an identification card to students must provide the contact information for the anonymous threat reporting system on the student identification cards. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Statewide anonymous threat reporting system; school requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A district or charter school that does not implement its own local anonymous threat reporting system under subdivision 2 is encouraged to provide to students, families, employees, and community members information about the Department of Public Safety's statewide anonymous threat reporting system and how to use the system by: new text end new text begin (1) posting on the district's or charter school's website information about the Department of Public Safety's statewide anonymous threat reporting system; new text end new text begin (2) including information in the student handbook about the Department of Public Safety's statewide anonymous threat reporting system; and new text end new text begin (3) notifying parents annually of the availability of the Department of Public Safety's statewide anonymous threat reporting system. new text end new text begin (b) A school district or charter school that does not implement its own local anonymous threat reporting system and issues an identification card to its students must provide the contact information for the statewide anonymous threat reporting system on the student identification cards. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin (a) By September 1, 2027, the Department of Education must, in collaboration with the Department of Public Safety, provide a list of third parties that provide anonymous threat reporting systems that meet the requirements under this section to all schools where a Minnesota resident may fulfill the compulsory instruction requirements under section 120A.22. The list must include third parties that offer free or low-cost anonymous threat reporting systems. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2029, and each year thereafter, the commissioner of education must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and public safety that includes the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the total number of schools using a local anonymous threat reporting system or the Department of Public Safety's anonymous threat reporting system; new text end new text begin (2) the total number of reports received through a local anonymous threat reporting system for the preceding school year; and new text end new text begin (3) for all reports received through a local anonymous threat reporting system since July 1, 2026, the following information disaggregated by school site: new text end new text begin (i) the type of reports received; new text end new text begin (ii) the method by which the report was received; and new text end new text begin (iii) the number of false reports received. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Funding sources. new text end new text begin A district or charter school may accept funding for an anonymous threat reporting system from public and private sources, including state or federal funding, that is available to increase school safety. Acceptance of funding from a public or private source does not abrogate or modify the anonymous threat reporting system requirements established under this section. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.66, subdivision 1d, is amended to read: Subd. 1d. Possession on school property; penalty. (a) Except as provided under paragraphs (d) and (f), whoever possesses, stores, or keeps a dangerous weapon while knowingly on school property is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. (b) Whoever uses or brandishes a replica firearm or a BB gun while knowingly on school property is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. (c) Whoever possesses, stores, or keeps a replica firearm or a BB gun while knowingly on school property is guilty of a misdemeanor. (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), (b), or (c), it is a misdemeanor for a person authorized to carry a firearm under the provisions of a permit or otherwise to carry a firearm on or about the person's clothes or person in a location the person knows is school property. Notwithstanding section 609.531, a firearm carried in violation of this paragraph is not subject to forfeiture. (e) As used in this subdivision: (1) "BB gun" means a device that fires or ejects a shot measuring .18 of an inch or less in diameter; (2) "dangerous weapon" has the meaning given it in section 609.02, subdivision 6; (3) "replica firearm" has the meaning given it in section 609.713; and (4) "school property" means: (i) a public or private elementary, middle, or secondary school building and its improved grounds, whether leased or owned by the school; (ii) a child care center licensed under chapter 142B during the period children are present and participating in a child care program; (iii) the area within a school bus when that bus is being used by a school to transport one or more elementary, middle, or secondary school students to and from school-related activities, including curricular, cocurricular, noncurricular, extracurricular, and supplementary activities; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (iv) that portion of a building or facility under the temporary, exclusive control of a public or private school, a school district, or an association of such entities where conspicuous signs are prominently posted at each entrance that give actual notice to persons of the school-related usedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (v) that portion of a building or facility hosting an activity or event sponsored by the Minnesota State High School League, pursuant to the authority granted to the league in chapter 128C, where conspicuous signs are prominently posted at each entrance that give actual notice to persons of the school-related use. new text end (f) new text begin Except as provided in paragraph (h), new text end this subdivision does not apply to: (1) active licensed peace officers; (2) military personnel or students participating in military training, who are on-duty, performing official duties; (3) persons authorized to carry a pistol under section 624.714 while in a motor vehicle or outside of a motor vehicle to directly place a firearm in, or retrieve it from, the trunk or rear area of the vehicle; deleted text begin (4) persons who keep or store in a motor vehicle pistols in accordance with section 624.714 or 624.715 or other firearms in accordance with section 97B.045; deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end firearm safety or marksmanship courses or activities conducted on school property; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end possession of dangerous weapons, BB guns, or replica firearms by a ceremonial color guard; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end a gun or knife show held on school property; new text begin (7) persons who: new text end new text begin (i) are employed by or under contract with a school or child care center to provide security services or who volunteer to provide security services; new text end new text begin (ii) hold a valid permit to carry a pistol under section 624.714; new text end new text begin (iii) are licensed as a protective agent or are employed by a license holder and have completed the training required for a protective agent authorized to carry a firearm under section 326.338 and Minnesota Rules, chapter 7506; and new text end new text begin (iv) are authorized in writing by the principal or other person having general control and supervision of the school or the director of a child care center to carry a firearm while performing official duties on school property; or new text end new text begin (8) retired peace officers who carry firearms in compliance with United States Code, title 18, section 926C, as amended through April 15, 2026, and who: new text end new text begin (i) are employed by or under contract with a school or child care center to provide security services or who volunteer to provide security services; and new text end new text begin (ii) are authorized in writing by the principal or other person having general control and supervision of the school or the director of a child care center to carry a firearm while performing official duties on school property. new text end deleted text begin (8) possession of dangerous weapons, BB guns, or replica firearms with written permission of the principal or other person having general control and supervision of the school or the director of a child care center; or deleted text end deleted text begin (9) persons who are on unimproved property owned or leased by a child care center, school, or school district unless the person knows that a student is currently present on the land for a school-related activity. deleted text end (g) Notwithstanding section 471.634, a school district or other entity composed exclusively of school districts may not regulate firearms, ammunition, or their respective components, when possessed or carried by nonstudents or nonemployees, in a manner that is inconsistent with this subdivision. new text begin (h) Notwithstanding sections 97B.045, 624.714, and 624.715, a person who is authorized to carry a firearm on school property pursuant to paragraph (f) must secure and store their firearms as provided in this paragraph when the person is no longer in an eligible on-duty status or not participating in that portion of the activity for which firearm possession is authorized. Each firearm subject to this paragraph must be secured and stored as follows: new text end new text begin (1) unloaded; new text end new text begin (2) in a locked container, safe, or other secure device made to contain a firearm that, when locked, cannot be readily opened without use of a key, combination, or electronic code and that is constructed to resist forced entry, tampering, and unauthorized access; and new text end new text begin (3) placed in a locked trunk compartment of a motor vehicle or, if the motor vehicle does not have a trunk compartment with a functioning lock, placed out of plain sight within the vehicle. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.666, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following words have the meanings given. (a) "Firearm" means a device designed to be used as a weapon, from which is expelled a projectile by the force of any explosion or force of combustion. (b) "Child" means a person under the age of 18 years. (c) "Loaded" means the firearm has ammunition in the chamber or magazine, if the magazine is in the firearmdeleted text begin , unless the firearm is incapable of being fired by a child who is likely to gain access to the firearmdeleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.666, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Access to firearms. A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who negligently stores or leaves a loaded firearm in a location where the person knows, or reasonably should know, that a child new text begin or a person prohibited from possessing firearms under section 624.713, subdivision 1, new text end is likely to gain access, unless reasonable action is taken to secure the firearm against access by the childnew text begin or the person prohibited from possessing firearmsnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [624.7145] SERIAL NUMBERS; GHOST GUNS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section and sections 624.7146 and 624.7147, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Federal firearms licensee" means a licensed importer, manufacturer, or dealer under United States Code, title 18, section 921(a)(9-11). new text end new text begin (c) "Ghost gun" means a firearm or a finished or unfinished frame or receiver that: new text end new text begin (1) lacks a unique serial number engraved or imprinted in metal alloy on the frame or receiver; new text end new text begin (2) is undetectable by a metal detector under the terms of United States Code, title 18, section 922(p), or can be readily modified to become undetectable; or new text end new text begin (3) is manufactured by a three-dimensional printer or computer numerical control milling machine by a person who is not a federally licensed firearm manufacturer. new text end new text begin Ghost gun does not include any firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that is permanently inoperable; is an antique firearm as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 3; or was manufactured prior to 1968. new text end new text begin (d) "Unfinished frame or receiver" means a forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage where it may be readily completed, assembled, or converted into a functional firearm. new text end new text begin (e) "Unique serial number" means the serial number and, if applicable, other information required under: new text end new text begin (1) United States Code, title 26, section 5842; new text end new text begin (2) United States Code, title 18, section 923; new text end new text begin (3) section 624.7147; or new text end new text begin (4) the law of any other state for the identification of firearms. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Alteration of serial numbers. new text end new text begin Any person who commits any of the following acts may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both: new text end new text begin (1) obliterates, removes, changes, or alters the unique serial number of a firearm; or new text end new text begin (2) receives or possesses a firearm, the unique serial number of which has been obliterated, removed, changed, or altered. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prohibition on possession. new text end new text begin Any person who owns, possesses, or receives a ghost gun may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Sale, transfer, and distribution of ghost guns. new text end new text begin Any person who sells, transfers, or distributes a ghost gun may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Firearms without serial numbers. new text end new text begin (a) Any person who, on August 1, 2026, is in possession of a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that lacks a unique serial number engraved or imprinted in metal alloy on the frame or receiver has 180 days to do one of the following: new text end new text begin (1) have a federal firearms licensee imprint a unique serial number on the firearm according to the requirements under section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (2) permanently remove the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver from the state; new text end new text begin (3) render the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (4) surrender the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver to a law enforcement agency for destruction. new text end new text begin (b) Any person who receives a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver without a unique serial number through inheritance and who is not otherwise prohibited from possessing the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver, must, within 30 days after inheriting the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver: new text end new text begin (1) have a federal firearms licensee imprint a unique serial number on the firearm according to the requirements under section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (2) permanently remove the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver from the state; new text end new text begin (3) render the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (4) surrender the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver to a law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (c) New residents of the state in possession of a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that lacks a unique serial number must, within 60 days of arriving in the state: new text end new text begin (1) have a federal firearms licensee imprint a unique serial number on the firearm according to the requirements under section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (2) permanently remove the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver from the state; new text end new text begin (3) render the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (4) surrender the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver to a law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) possession of a ghost gun by a federal firearms licensee or the sale, transfer, or distribution of a ghost gun to a federal firearms licensee; new text end new text begin (2) the transfer of a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver that lacks a unique serial number between the owner and a federal firearms licensee for the purposes of serialization under section 624.7147; new text end new text begin (3) a law enforcement officer for the purposes of enforcing this section, collecting evidence, or destroying a ghost gun; or new text end new text begin (4) a member of the United States armed forces for use in the course of the member's official duties. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin This section is enforceable under section 8.31. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [624.7146] ASSEMBLY AND MANUFACTURE OF FIREARMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Assemble" means to fit together component parts. new text end new text begin (c) "Manufacture" means to fabricate, make, form, produce, or construct by manual labor or machinery. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Assembling firearms; requirements; limitations. new text end new text begin (a) A person who is not a federal firearms licensee is prohibited from assembling or manufacturing more than three firearms in a calendar year. new text end new text begin (b) Before assembling or manufacturing a firearm, a person assembling or manufacturing a firearm that does not have a unique serial number or mark of identification imprinted on the frame or receiver must request a unique serial number from a federal firearms licensee that complies with the requirements under section 624.7147. new text end new text begin (c) Within ten days of assembling a firearm, the owner must have a federal firearms licensee imprint the firearm with the unique serial number assigned pursuant to paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this section permits the assembly or manufacture of ghost guns. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Manufacturing prohibitions. new text end new text begin (a) It is unlawful for a person, other than a federal firearms licensee, to manufacture a firearm using a computer numerical control milling machine or three-dimensional printer. new text end new text begin (b) Any person who violates this subdivision may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Firearm design files. new text end new text begin (a) It is unlawful to sell, transfer, or distribute to a person in the state, other than to a federal firearms licensee, digital instructions in the form of computer-aided design files or other code or instructions stored and displayed in electronic format as a digital model that may be used to program a three-dimensional printer to manufacture a ghost gun. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin This section is enforceable under section 8.31. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [624.7147] SERIALIZATION OF FIREARMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A federal firearms licensee must comply with this subdivision when assigning and applying a unique serial number to a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver owned by a resident of the state. new text end new text begin (b) The unique serial number must be formatted with the federal firearms licensee's abbreviated federal firearms license number as a prefix, which is the first three and last five digits of the license number, followed by a hyphen, then followed by a number that the licensee has not previously assigned as a suffix. The serial number or numbers must be imprinted in a manner that accords with the requirements under federal law for affixing serial numbers to firearms, including the requirements that the serial number or numbers be at the minimum size and depth and not susceptible to being readily obliterated, altered, or removed, and the licensee must retain records that accord with the requirements under federal law in the case of the sale of a firearm. The imprinting of any serial number upon an undetectable firearm must be done on a steel plaque under United States Code, title 18, section 922(p). new text end new text begin (c) A federal firearms licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique serial number on a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver under this section must maintain a record of each instance of imprinting a serial number indefinitely. A federal firearms licensee providing marking services under this section must make all records accessible for inspection upon the request of a state or local law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (d) A federal firearms licensee that engraves, casts, stamps, or otherwise conspicuously and permanently places a unique serial number on a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver under this section must record the serial number at the time of every transaction involving the transfer of a firearm, rifle, shotgun, finished frame or receiver, or unfinished frame or receiver that has been marked in compliance with the federal guidelines under Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, section 478.124. new text end new text begin (e) By August 1, 2026, the commissioner of public safety must issue a public notice regarding the provisions of this section in order to educate the public. The notice must include posting on the Department of Public Safety's website and may include written notification or any other means of communication statewide to all Minnesota-based federal firearms licensees authorized to provide marking services under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Data classification. new text end new text begin Data related to unique serial numbers under subdivision 1, paragraph (c), is classified in section 13.87, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7171, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) As used in sections 624.7171 to 624.7178, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Family or household members" deleted text begin means:deleted text end new text begin has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 2, paragraph (b).new text end deleted text begin (1) spouses and former spouses of the respondent; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) parents and children of the respondent; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) persons who are presently residing with the respondent; or deleted text end deleted text begin (4) a person involved in a significant romantic or sexual relationship with the respondent. deleted text end deleted text begin In determining whether persons are in a significant romantic or sexual relationship under clause (4), the court shall consider the length of time of the relationship; type of relationship; and frequency of interaction between the parties. deleted text end (c) "Firearm" has the meaning given in section 609.666, subdivision 1, paragraph (a). (d) "Mental health professional" has the meaning given in section 245I.02, subdivision 27. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7171, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Generally. (a) There shall exist an action known as a petition for an extreme risk protection order, which order shall enjoin and prohibit the respondent from possessing or purchasing firearms for as long as the order remains in effect. (b) A petition for relief under sections 624.7171 to 624.7178 may be made by deleted text begin the chiefdeleted text end new text begin anew text end law enforcement deleted text begin officer, the chief law enforcement officer's designeedeleted text end new text begin agencynew text end , a city or county deleted text begin attorneydeleted text end new text begin attorney's officenew text end , any family or household members of the respondent, or a guardian, as defined in section 524.1-201, clause deleted text begin (27)deleted text end new text begin (28)new text end , of the respondent.new text begin The respondent may also petition on their own behalf.new text end (c) A petition for relief shall allege that the respondent poses a significant danger of bodily harm to other persons or is at significant risk of suicide by possessing a firearm. The petition shall be accompanied by an affidavit made under oath stating specific facts and circumstances forming a basis to allege that an extreme risk protection order should be granted. The affidavit may include but is not limited to evidence showing any of the factors described in section 624.7172, subdivision 2. (d) A petition for emergency relief under section 624.7174 shall additionally allege that the respondent presents an immediate and present danger of either bodily harm to others or of taking their life. (e) A petition for relief must describe, to the best of the petitioner's knowledge, the types and location of any firearms believed by the petitioner to be possessed by the respondent. (f) The court shall provide simplified forms and clerical assistance to help with the writing and filing of a petition under this section. (g) The state court administrator shall create all forms necessary under sections 624.7171 to 624.7178. (h) The filing fees for an extreme risk protection order under this section are waived for the petitioner and respondent. The court administrator, the sheriff of any county in this state, and other law enforcement and corrections officers shall perform their duties relating to service of process without charge to the petitioner. The court shall direct payment of the reasonable costs of service of process if served by a private process server when the sheriff or other law enforcement or corrections officer is unavailable or if service is made by publication, without requiring the petitioner to make application under section 563.01. (i) The court shall advise the petitioner of the right to serve the respondent by alternate notice under section 624.7172, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), if the respondent is avoiding personal service by concealment or otherwise, and shall assist in the writing and filing of the affidavit. (j) The court shall advise the petitioner of the right to request a hearing under section 624.7174. If the petitioner does not request a hearing, the court shall advise the petitioner that the respondent may request a hearing and that notice of the hearing date and time will be provided to the petitioner by mail at least five days before the hearing. (k) Any proceeding under sections 624.7171 to 624.7178 shall be in addition to other civil or criminal remediesnew text begin and does not restrict or limit a law enforcement agency's legal authority to respond to exigent circumstancesnew text end . (l) All health records and other health information provided in a petition or considered as evidence in a proceeding under sections 624.7171 to 624.7178 shall be protected from public disclosure but may be provided to law enforcement agencies as described in this section. (m) Any extreme risk protection order or subsequent extension issued under sections 624.7171 to 624.7178 shall be forwarded by the court administrator within 24 hours to the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the residence of the respondent and electronically transmitted within three business days to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System. When an order expires or is terminated by the court, the court must submit a request that the order be removed from the National Instant Background Check System. Each appropriate law enforcement agency shall make available to other law enforcement officers, through a system for verification, information as to the existence and status of any extreme risk protection order issued under sections 624.7171 to 624.7178. new text begin (n) A judge shall consider a petition for emergency relief under section 624.7174 when presented to the judge by a chief law enforcement officer or the chief's designee. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7171, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Mental health professionals. When a mental health professional has a statutory duty to warn another of a client's serious threat of physically violent behavior or determines that a client presents a significant risk of suicide by possessing a firearm, the mental health professional must communicate the threat or risk to the deleted text begin sheriff of the countydeleted text end new text begin law enforcement agency with primary jurisdiction over new text end where the client resides and make a recommendation deleted text begin to the sheriffdeleted text end regarding the client's fitness to possess firearms. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7172, is amended to read: 624.7172 EXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDERS ISSUED AFTER HEARING. Subdivision 1. Hearing. (a) Upon receipt of the petition for an order after a hearing, the court must schedule and hold a hearing within 14 days from the date the petition was received. (b) The court shall advise the petitioner of the right to request an emergency extreme risk protection order under section 624.7174 separately from or simultaneously with the petition under this subdivision. (c) deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin Anew text end petitioning new text begin law enforcement new text end agency shall be responsible for new text begin the new text end service of an extreme risk protection order issued by the court and shall further be the agency responsible for the execution of any legal process required for the seizure and storage of firearms subject to the order. deleted text begin Nothing in this provision limits the ability of the law enforcement agency of record from cooperating with other law enforcement entities. When a court issues an extreme risk protection order for a person who resides on Tribal territory, the chief law enforcement officer of the law enforcement agency responsible for serving the order must request the assistance and counsel of the appropriate Tribal police department prior to serving the respondent. When the petitioner is a family or household member of the respondent, the primary law enforcement agency serving the jurisdiction of residency of the respondent shall be responsible for the execution of any legal process required for the seizure and storage of firearms subject to the order.deleted text end new text begin When the petitioner is a city or county attorney's office or a family or household member of the respondent, the primary law enforcement agency with jurisdiction of residency of the respondent shall be responsible for the service of an extreme risk protection order issued by the court and shall further be the agency responsible for the execution of any legal process required for the seizure and storage of firearms subject to the order. Nothing in this provision limits the ability of the law enforcement agency of record from cooperating with other law enforcement entities. When a court issues an extreme risk protection order for a person who resides on Tribal land, the chief law enforcement officer of the law enforcement agency responsible for serving the order must request the assistance and counsel of the appropriate Tribal police department prior to serving the respondent.new text end (d) deleted text begin Personal service of notice for the hearing may be made upon the respondent at any time up to 48 hours prior to the time set for the hearing, provided thatdeleted text end The respondent deleted text begin at the hearingdeleted text end may request a continuance of up to 14 days if the respondent is served less than five days prior to the hearingdeleted text begin , whichdeleted text end new text begin . Thenew text end continuance shall be granted unless there are compelling reasons not to do so. If the court grants the requested continuance, and an existing emergency order under section 624.7174 will expire due to the continuance, the court shall also issue a written order continuing the emergency order pending the new time set for the hearing. (e) If personal service cannot be made, the court may order service of the petition and any order issued under this section by alternate means. The application for alternate service must include the last known location of the respondent; the petitioner's most recent contacts with the respondent; the last known location of the respondent's employment; the names and locations of the respondent's parents, siblings, children, and other close relatives; the names and locations of other persons who are likely to know the respondent's whereabouts; and a description of efforts to locate those persons. The court shall consider the length of time the respondent's location has been unknown, the likelihood that the respondent's location will become known, the nature of the relief sought, and the nature of efforts made to locate the respondent. The court shall order service by first class mail, forwarding address requested, to any addresses where there is a reasonable possibility that mail or information will be forwarded or communicated to the respondent. The court may also order publication, within or without the state, but only if it might reasonably succeed in notifying the respondent of the proceeding. Service shall be deemed complete 14 days after mailing or 14 days after court-ordered publication. (f) deleted text begin When a petitioner who is not the sheriff of the county where the respondent resides, the sheriff's designee, or a family or household member files a petition, the petitioner must provide notice of the action to the sheriff of the county where the respondent resides. When a family or household member is the petitioner,deleted text end The court must provide notice of the action to the sheriff of the county where the respondent resides. new text begin (g) Except as otherwise required under section 624.7174, paragraph (f), an order issued pursuant to this section can be served on the respondent electronically or by first class mail. new text end Subd. 2. Relief by court. (a) At the hearing, the petitioner must prove by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent poses a significant danger to other persons or is at significant risk of suicide by possessing a firearm. (b) In determining whether to grant the order after a hearing, the court shall consider evidence of the following, whether or not the petitioner has provided evidence of the same: (1) a history of threats or acts of violence by the respondent directed toward another person; (2) the history of use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force by the respondent against another person; (3) a violation of any court order, including but not limited to orders issued under sections new text begin 609.748 or new text end 624.7171 to 624.7178 or chapter 260C or 518B; (4) a prior arrest for a violent felony offense; (5) a conviction or prior arrest for a violent misdemeanor offense, for a stalking offense under section 609.749, or for domestic assault under section 609.2242; (6) a deleted text begin conviction for an offensedeleted text end new text begin historynew text end of cruelty to animals deleted text begin under chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 343deleted text end ; (7) the unlawful and reckless use, display, or brandishing of a firearm by the respondent; (8) suicide attempts by the respondent or a serious mental illness; and (9) whether the respondent is named in an existing order in effect under sections new text begin 609.748 or new text end 624.7171 to 624.7178 or chapter 260C or 518Bdeleted text begin , or party to a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action under sections 624.7171 to 624.7178 or chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 518Bdeleted text end . (c) In determining whether to grant the order after a hearing, the court may: (1) subpoena peace officers who have had contact with the respondent to provide written or sworn testimony regarding the officer's contacts with the respondent; and (2) consider any other evidence that bears on whether the respondent poses a danger to others or is at risk of suicide. (d) If the court finds there is clear and convincing evidence to issue an extreme risk protection order, the court shall issue the order prohibiting the person from possessing or purchasing a firearm for the duration of the order. The court shall inform the respondent that the respondent is prohibited from possessing or purchasing firearms and shall deleted text begin issue adeleted text end new text begin order the respondent to new text end transfer deleted text begin order underdeleted text end new text begin the respondent's firearms pursuant tonew text end section 624.7175. The court shall also give notice to the county attorney's office, which may take action as it deems appropriate. (e) The court shall determine the length of time the order is in effect, but may not set the length of time for less than six months or more than one yearnew text begin . Unless a period longer than one year is agreed upon by the respondentnew text end , new text begin orders are new text end subject to renewal or extension under section 624.7173. (f) If there is no existing emergency order under section 624.7174 at the time an order is granted under this section, the court shall determine by clear and convincing evidence whether the respondent presents an immediate and present danger of bodily harm. If the court so determines, the new text begin court shall order the respondent to new text end transfer deleted text begin order shall include the provisionsdeleted text end new text begin the respondent's firearms asnew text end described in section 624.7175, paragraph (d). (g) If, after a hearing, the court does not issue an deleted text begin order of protectiondeleted text end new text begin extreme risk protection ordernew text end , the court shall vacate any emergency extreme risk protection order currently in effect. (h) A respondent may waive the respondent's right to contest the hearing and consent to the court's imposition of an extreme risk protection order. deleted text begin The court shall seal the petition filed under this section and section 624.7174 if a respondent who consents to imposition of an extreme risk protection order requests that the petition be sealed, unless the court finds that there is clear and convincing evidence that the interests of the public and public safety outweigh the disadvantages to the respondent of not sealing the petition. All extreme risk protection orders based on the respondent being a danger to others shall remain public. Extreme risk protection orders issued for respondents who are solely at risk of suicide shall not be public.deleted text end new text begin (i) If a party requests, the court shall consider whether a guardian ad litem should be appointed pursuant to rule 17.02 of the Rules of Civil Procedure for the respondent. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7173, is amended to read: 624.7173 SUBSEQUENT EXTENSIONS AND TERMINATION. (a) Upon application by any party entitled to petition for an order under section 624.7172, and after notice to the respondent and a hearing, the court may extend the relief granted in deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin thenew text end existing order deleted text begin granted after a hearing under section 624.7172deleted text end . Application for an extension may be made any time within the three months before the expiration of the existing order. The court may extend the order if the court deleted text begin makes the same findingsdeleted text end new text begin findsnew text end by clear and convincing evidence deleted text begin as required for granting of an initial order under section 624.7172, subdivision 2, paragraph (d)deleted text end new text begin that the respondent still poses a significant danger of bodily harm to other persons or is at significant risk of suicide by possessing a firearmnew text end . The minimum length deleted text begin of timedeleted text end of an extension is six months and the maximum length of time of an extension is one year. The court shall consider the same types of evidence as required for the initial order under section 624.7172, subdivision 2, paragraphs (b) and (c). new text begin (b) An extreme risk protection order may be extended for a period of up to five years if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent still poses a significant danger of bodily harm to other persons or is at significant risk of suicide by possessing a firearm and: new text end new text begin (1) the respondent has violated a prior or existing extreme risk protection order on two or more occasions; or new text end new text begin (2) the respondent is or has been subject to two or more extreme risk protection orders. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Upon application by the respondent to an order issued under section 624.7172, the court may deleted text begin terminatedeleted text end new text begin vacatenew text end an order after a hearing at which the respondent shall bear the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent does not pose a significant danger to other persons or is at significant risk of suicide by possessing a firearm. Application deleted text begin for terminationdeleted text end new text begin to vacatenew text end may be made one time deleted text begin fordeleted text end every six months an order is in effect. If an order has been issued for a period of six months, the respondent may apply deleted text begin for terminationdeleted text end new text begin to vacatenew text end one time.new text begin If the court finds that the respondent has not met the burden of proof, the court shall deny the request and no request may be made to vacate the extreme risk protection order until six months have elapsed from the date of denial.new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7174, is amended to read: 624.7174 EMERGENCY ISSUANCE OF EXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDER. (a) In determining whether to grant an emergency extreme risk protection order, the court shall consider evidence of all facts identified in section 624.7172, subdivision 2, paragraphs (b) and (c). (b) The court shall advise the petitioner of the right to request an order after a hearing under section 624.7172 separately from or simultaneously with the petition. (c) If the court finds there is probable cause that (1) the respondent poses a significant danger of bodily harm to other persons or is at significant risk of suicide by possessing a firearm, and (2) the respondent presents an immediate and present danger of either bodily harm to others or of taking their life, the court shall issue an ex parte emergency order prohibiting the respondent from possessing or purchasing a firearm for the duration of the order. The order shall inform the respondent that the respondent is prohibited from possessing or purchasing firearms and shall deleted text begin issue adeleted text end new text begin order the respondent tonew text end transfer deleted text begin order underdeleted text end new text begin the respondent's firearms pursuant tonew text end section 624.7175, paragraph (d). (d) A finding by the court that there is a basis for issuing an emergency extreme risk protection order constitutes a finding that sufficient reasons exist not to require notice under applicable court rules governing applications for ex parte relief. (e) The emergency order shall have a fixed period of 14 days unless a hearing is set under section 624.7172 on an earlier date, in which case the order shall expire upon a judge's finding that no order is issued under section 624.7172. (f) Except as provided in paragraph (g), the respondent shall be personally served immediately with a copy of the emergency order and a copy of the petition and, if a hearing is requested by the petitioner under section 624.7172, notice of the date set for the hearing. If the petitioner does not request a hearing under section 624.7172, new text begin the respondent has a right to request a hearing within five days of service of the order. new text end An order served on a respondent under this section must include a notice advising the respondent of the right to request a hearing challenging the issuance of the emergency order, deleted text begin anddeleted text end must be accompanied by a form that can be used by the respondent to request a hearingnew text begin , and must include a conspicuous notice that a hearing will not be held unless requested by the respondent within five days of service of the ordernew text end . (g) Service of the emergency order may be made by alternate service as provided under section 624.7172, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), provided that the petitioner files the affidavit required under that subdivision. If the petitioner does not request a hearing under section 624.7172, the petition mailed to the respondent's residence, if known, must be accompanied by the form for requesting a hearing described in paragraph (f). Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7175, is amended to read: 624.7175 TRANSFER OF FIREARMS. (a) Except new text begin as otherwise provided in this paragraph or new text end as provided in paragraph (b), upon issuance of an extreme risk protection order, the court shall direct the respondent to transfer any firearms the person possesses as soon as reasonably practicable, but in no case later than 24 hours, to a federally licensed firearms dealer deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end a law enforcement agencynew text begin , or a third party who may lawfully receive the firearms. When a peace officer presents a respondent with a search warrant issued pursuant to paragraph (d), the respondent must surrender all firearms in the respondent's possession to the peace officer immediatelynew text end . If the respondent elects to transfer the respondent's firearms to a law enforcement agency, the agency must accept the transfer. The transfer may be permanent or temporary. A temporary firearm transfer only entitles the receiving party to possess the firearm and does not transfer ownership or title. new text begin The respondent may not transfer the firearms to a third party who resides with the respondent. new text end If the respondent makes a temporary transfer to a federally licensed firearms dealer, the dealer may charge the respondent a reasonable fee to store the firearms. If the temporary transfer is made to a law enforcement agency, the agency may not charge the respondent any storage or other associated fee. A dealer or agency deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin shallnew text end establish policies for disposal of abandoned firearmsdeleted text begin , provideddeleted text end new text begin .new text end These policies deleted text begin requiredeleted text end new text begin must providenew text end that the respondent be notified prior to disposal of abandoned firearms. deleted text begin If a respondent permanently transfers the respondent's firearms to a law enforcement agency, the agency must compensate the respondent at fair market value and may not charge the respondent any processing or other fees.deleted text end (b) A person directed to transfer any firearms pursuant to paragraph (a) may transfer any antique firearm, as defined in United States Code, title 18, section 921, paragraph (a), clause (16), as amended, or a curio or relic as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, section 478.11, as amended, to a relative who does not live with the respondent after confirming that the relative may lawfully own deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin andnew text end possess a firearm. (c) The respondent must file proof of transfer new text begin with the court new text end as provided in this paragraph. (1) A law enforcement agency deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end federally licensed firearms dealernew text begin , or third partynew text end accepting transfer of a firearm pursuant to this section shall provide proof of transfer to the respondent. The proof of transfer must specify whether the firearms were permanently or temporarily transferred and must include the name of the respondent, date of transfer, and the serial number, manufacturer, and model of all transferred firearms. deleted text begin If transfer is made to a federally licensed firearms dealer,deleted text end The respondent shall, within two business days after being served with the order, file a copy of proof of transfer with the deleted text begin law enforcement agencydeleted text end new text begin courtnew text end and attest that all firearms owned or possessed at the time of the order have been transferred in accordance with this section and that the person currently does not possess any firearms. If the respondent claims not to own or possess firearms, the respondent shall file a declaration of nonpossession with the deleted text begin law enforcement agencydeleted text end new text begin courtnew text end attesting that, at the time of the order, the respondent neither owned nor possessed any firearms, and that the respondent currently neither owns nor possesses any firearms. If the transfer is made to a relative pursuant to paragraph (b), the relative must sign an affidavit under oath before a notary public either acknowledging that the respondent permanently transferred the respondent's antique firearms, curios, or relics to the relative or agreeing to temporarily store the respondent's antique firearms, curios, or relics until such time as the respondent is legally permitted to possess firearms. To the extent possible, the affidavit shall indicate the serial number, make, and model of all antique firearms, curios, or relics transferred by the respondent to the relative. (2) The court shall deleted text begin sealdeleted text end new text begin make confidentialnew text end affidavits, proofs of transfer, and declarations of nonpossession filed pursuant to this paragraph. (d) If a court issues an emergency order under section 624.7174, or makes a finding of immediate and present danger under section 624.7172, subdivision 2, paragraph (f), and there is probable cause to believe the respondent possesses firearms, the court shall issue a search warrant deleted text begin to the local law enforcement agencydeleted text end to take possession of all firearms deleted text begin indeleted text end the deleted text begin respondent's possessiondeleted text end new text begin respondent possesses or ownsnew text end as soon as practicable. The deleted text begin chief law enforcement officer, or the chief's designee,deleted text end new text begin officer or officers tasked with serving the search warrantnew text end shall notify the respondent of the option to voluntarily comply with the order by surrendering the respondent's firearms to law enforcement prior to execution of the search warrant. Only if the respondent refuses to voluntarily comply with the order to surrender the respondent's firearms shall the officer or officers tasked with serving the search warrant execute the warrant. new text begin (e) If the respondent voluntarily agrees to comply with the order by surrendering the respondent's firearms to law enforcement prior to execution of the search warrant, the respondent is immune from criminal prosecution for unlawful possession of the firearms under section 624.713. new text end new text begin (f)new text end The local law enforcement agency shall, upon written notice from the respondent, transfer the firearms to a federally licensed firearms dealer. Before a local law enforcement agency transfers a firearm under this paragraph, the agency shall require the federally licensed firearms dealer receiving the firearm to submit a proof of transfer that complies with the requirements for proofs of transfer established in paragraph (c). The deleted text begin agency shall filedeleted text end new text begin respondent is responsible for filingnew text end all proofs of transfer received deleted text begin bydeleted text end new text begin withnew text end the court within two business days of the transfer. A federally licensed firearms dealer who accepts a firearm transfer pursuant to this paragraph shall comply with paragraphs (a) and (c) as if accepting transfer directly from the respondent. deleted text begin A law enforcement agency may establish policies for disposal of abandoned firearms, provided these policies require that the respondent be notified prior to disposal of abandoned firearms.deleted text end new text begin (g) A respondent may sell their firearms while subject to an extreme risk protection order. The sale of firearms by the respondent must comply with paragraph (f). new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7176, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Law enforcement. A local law enforcement agency that accepted temporary transfer of firearms under section 624.7175 shall return the firearms to the respondent after the expiration of the order, provided the respondent is not otherwise prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal lawnew text begin and the respondent lawfully possessed the firearms prior to surrendering the firearmsnew text end . Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7176, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firearms dealernew text begin or third partynew text end . A federally licensed firearms dealer new text begin or third party new text end that accepted temporary transfer of firearms under section 624.7175 shall return the transferred firearms to the respondent upon request after the expiration of the order, provided the respondent is not otherwise prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. A federally licensed firearms dealer returning firearms shall comply with state and federal law as though transferring a firearm from the dealer's own inventory. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7177, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Violation of order. A person who possesses a firearm and knows or should have known that the person is prohibited from doing so by an extreme risk protection order under section 624.7172 or 624.7174, or by an deleted text begin order of protectiondeleted text end new text begin extreme risk protection ordernew text end granted by a judge or referee pursuant to a substantially similar law of another state, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be prohibited from possessing firearms for a period of five years. Each extreme risk protection order granted under this chapter must contain a conspicuous notice to the respondent regarding the penalty for violation of the order. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7178, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Liability protection for petition. A chief law enforcement officer, the chief law enforcement officer's designee, deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin a law enforcement agency,new text end a city or county attorney deleted text begin whodeleted text end new text begin , or a city or county attorney's office thatnew text end , in good faith, decides not to petition for an extreme risk protection order or emergency extreme risk protection order shall be immune from criminal or civil liability. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7178, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Liability protection for mental health professionals. A mental health professional who provides notice to the deleted text begin sheriffdeleted text end new text begin law enforcement agencynew text end under section 624.7171, subdivision 5, is immune from monetary liability and no cause of action, or disciplinary action by the person's licensing board may arise against the mental health professional for disclosure of confidences to the deleted text begin sheriffdeleted text end new text begin law enforcement agencynew text end , for failure to disclose confidences to the deleted text begin sheriffdeleted text end new text begin law enforcement agencynew text end , or for erroneous disclosure of confidences to the deleted text begin sheriffdeleted text end new text begin law enforcement agencynew text end in a good faith effort to warn against or take precautions against a client's violent behavior or threat of suicide. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.553, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Discharge firearm; kill animal. new text begin (a) new text end Whenever a peace officer discharges a firearm in the course of duty, other than for training purposes or the killing of an animal that is sick, injured, or dangerous, notification shall be filed within 30 days of the incident by the officer's department head with the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner of public safety shall forward a copy of the filing to the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training. The notification shall contain information concerning the reason for and circumstances surrounding discharge of the firearm. The commissioner of public safety shall file a report with the legislature by November 15 of each even-numbered year containing summary information concerning use of firearms by peace officers. new text begin (b) If the discharge under paragraph (a) is accidental or due to the officer's negligence, the notification to the commissioner and the Peace Officer Standards and Training Board and subsequent report to the legislature must include the make, model, and caliber of the firearm and information on any of the firearm's accessories, including but not limited to lights, lasers, and holsters. The required information on accessories must specify whether the accessory was part of the manufacturing process or was an after-market addition. This paragraph expires August 1, 2031. new text end Sec. 21. new text begin REENACTMENT OF BAN ON BINARY TRIGGERS.new text end new text begin Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 36, section 2, is reenacted retroactively and without interruption from January 1, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 22. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.667, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 4 HUMAN SERVICES MENTAL HEALTH Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.761, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Psychological testing and assessment rates. new text end new text begin (a) Effective for services rendered on or after January 1, 2027, or on or after the date of federal approval, whichever is later, the commissioner must pay 100 percent of the total published Medicare payment rate, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 438.6, for the following services: new text end new text begin (1) neuropsychological assessments under section 256B.0671, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (2) neuropsychological testing under section 256B.0671, subdivision 9; and new text end new text begin (3) psychological testing under section 256B.0671, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin (b) Managed care and county-based purchasing plans must reimburse providers at an amount that is at least equal to the fee-for-service rate for services under this subdivision. The commissioner must monitor the effect of this rate adjustment on enrollee access to mental health services. If for any contract year federal approval is not received for this paragraph, the commissioner must adjust the capitation rates paid to managed care and county-based purchasing plans for that contract year to reflect the removal of this paragraph. Contracts between managed care and county-based purchasing plans and providers to whom this paragraph applies must allow recovery of payments from those providers if capitation rates are adjusted in accordance with this paragraph. Payment recoveries must not exceed the amount equal to any increase in rates that results from this paragraph. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision expires on the effective date of Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 8, section 29. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 38, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end ARTICLE 5 CONFORMING AMENDMENTS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.66, subdivision 1f, is amended to read: Subd. 1f. Gross misdemeanor; transferring firearm without background check. A person, other than a federally licensed firearms dealer, who transfers a pistol deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end semiautomatic military-style assault weaponnew text begin , or large-capacity magazinenew text end to another without complying with the transfer requirements of deleted text begin section 624.7132deleted text end new text begin sections 624.7131, 624.7134, and 624.7135new text end , is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the transferee possesses or uses the weapon within one year after the transfer in furtherance of a felony crime of violence, and if: (1) the transferee was prohibited from possessing the weapon under section 624.713 at the time of the transfer; or (2) it was reasonably foreseeable at the time of the transfer that the transferee was likely to use or possess the weapon in furtherance of a felony crime of violence. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 624.7132, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Required information. Except as provided in this section and section 624.7131, every person who agrees to transfer a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end shall report the following information in writing to the chief of police of the organized full-time police department of the municipality where the proposed transferee resides or to the appropriate county sheriff if there is no such local chief of police: (1) the name, residence, telephone number, and driver's license number or nonqualification certificate number, if any, of the proposed transferee; (2) the sex, date of birth, height, weight, and color of eyes, and distinguishing physical characteristics, if any, of the proposed transferee; (3) a statement that the proposed transferee authorizes the release to the local police authority of commitment information about the proposed transferee maintained by the Direct Care and Treatment executive board, to the extent that the information relates to the proposed transferee's eligibility to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end under section 624.713, subdivision 1; (4) a statement by the proposed transferee that the transferee is not prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end ; and (5) the address of the place of business of the transferor. The report shall be signed and dated by the transferor and the proposed transferee. The report shall be delivered by the transferor to the chief of police or sheriff no later than three days after the date of the agreement to transfer, excluding weekends and legal holidays. The statement under clause (3) must comply with any applicable requirements of Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 2.31 to 2.35, with respect to consent to disclosure of alcohol or drug abuse patient records. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Notification. The chief of police or sheriff shall notify the transferor and proposed transferee in writing as soon as possible if the chief or sheriff determines that the proposed transferee is prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . The notification to the transferee shall specify the grounds for the disqualification of the proposed transferee and shall set forth in detail the transferee's right of appeal under subdivision 13. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 7 or 8, no person shall deliver a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a proposed transferee until 30 days after the date the agreement to transfer is delivered to a chief of police or sheriff in accordance with subdivision 1 unless the chief of police or sheriff waives all or a portion of the waiting period. The chief of police or sheriff may waive all or a portion of the waiting period in writing if the chief of police or sheriff: (1) determines the proposed transferee is not disqualified prior to the waiting period concluding; or (2) finds that the transferee requires access to a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end because of a threat to the life of the transferee or of any member of the household of the transferee. Prior to modifying the waiting period under the authority granted in clause (2), the chief of police or sheriff must first determine that the proposed transferee is not prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law. No person shall deliver a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a proposed transferee after receiving a written notification that the chief of police or sheriff has determined that the proposed transferee is prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . If the transferor makes a report of transfer and receives no written notification of disqualification of the proposed transferee within 30 business days after delivery of the agreement to transfer, the pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end may be delivered to the transferee, unless the transferor knows the transferee is ineligible to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Grounds for disqualification. (a) The chief of police or sheriff shall deny an application if the proposed transferee is: (1) prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end ; (2) determined to be a danger to self or the public when in possession of firearms under paragraph (b); or (3) listed in the criminal gang investigative data system under section 299C.091. (b) A chief of police or sheriff shall deny an application if there exists a substantial likelihood that the proposed transferee is a danger to self or the public when in possession of a firearm. To deny the application under this paragraph, the chief of police or sheriff must provide the applicant with written notification and the specific factual basis justifying the denial, including the source of the factual basis. The chief of police or sheriff must inform the applicant of the applicant's right to submit, within 20 business days, any additional documentation relating to the propriety of the denial. Upon receiving any additional documentation, the chief of police or sheriff must reconsider the denial and inform the applicant within 15 business days of the result of the reconsideration. Any denial after reconsideration must be in the same form and substance as the original denial and must specifically address any continued deficiencies in light of the additional documentation submitted by the applicant. The applicant must be informed of the right to seek de novo review of the denial as provided in subdivision 13. (c) A chief of police or sheriff need not process an application under this section if the person has had an application denied pursuant to paragraph (b) and less than six months have elapsed since the denial was issued or the person's appeal under subdivision 13 was denied, whichever is later. (d) A chief of police or sheriff who denies an application pursuant to paragraph (b) must provide a copy of the notice of disqualification to the chief of police or sheriff with joint jurisdiction over the applicant's residence. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Number of pistols deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weaponsdeleted text end . Any number of pistols deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weaponsdeleted text end may be the subject of a single transfer agreement and report to the chief of police or sheriff. Nothing in this section or section 624.7131 shall be construed to limit or restrict the number of pistols deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weaponsdeleted text end a person may acquire. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Restriction on records. Except as provided for in section 624.7134, subdivision 3, paragraph (e), if, after a determination that the transferee is not a person prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end , a transferee requests that no record be maintained of the fact of who is the transferee of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end , the chief of police or sheriff shall sign the transfer report and return it to the transferee as soon as possible. Thereafter, no government employee or agency shall maintain a record of the transfer that identifies the transferee, and the transferee shall retain the report of transfer. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Exclusions. Except as otherwise provided in section 609.66, subdivision 1f, this section shall not apply to transfers of antique firearms as curiosities or for their historical significance or value, transfers to or between federally licensed firearms dealers, transfers by order of court, involuntary transfers, transfers at death or the following transfers: (1) a transfer by a person other than a federally licensed firearms dealer; (2) a loan to a prospective transferee if the loan is intended for a period of no more than one day; (3) the delivery of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person for the purpose of repair, reconditioning or remodeling; (4) a loan by a teacher to a student in a course designed to teach marksmanship or safety with a pistol and approved by the commissioner of natural resources; (5) a loan between persons at a firearms collectors exhibition; (6) a loan between persons lawfully engaged in hunting or target shooting if the loan is intended for a period of no more than 12 hours; (7) a loan between law enforcement officers who have the power to make arrests other than citizen arrests; and (8) a loan between employees or between the employer and an employee in a business if the employee is required to carry a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end by reason of employment and is the holder of a valid permit to carry a pistol. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Penalties. (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), a person who does any of the following is guilty of a gross misdemeanor: (1) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end in violation of subdivisions 1 to 13; (2) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person who has made a false statement in order to become a transferee, if the transferor knows or has reason to know the transferee has made the false statement; (3) knowingly becomes a transferee in violation of subdivisions 1 to 13; or (4) makes a false statement in order to become a transferee of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end knowing or having reason to know the statement is false. (b) A person who does either of the following is guilty of a felony: (1) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person under the age of 18 in violation of subdivisions 1 to 13; or (2) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person under the age of 18 who has made a false statement in order to become a transferee, if the transferor knows or has reason to know the transferee has made the false statement. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Background check conducted by federally licensed firearms dealer. (a) Where both parties to a prospective transfer of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end are unlicensed persons, the transferor and transferee may appear jointly before a federally licensed firearms dealer with the firearm and request that the federally licensed firearms dealer conduct a background check on the transferee and facilitate the transfer. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a federally licensed firearms dealer who agrees to facilitate a transfer under this section shall: (1) process the transfer as though transferring the firearm from the dealer's inventory to the transferee; and (2) comply with all requirements of federal and state law that would apply if the firearms dealer were making the transfer, including at a minimum all background checks and record keeping requirements. The exception to the report of transfer process in section 624.7132, subdivision 12, clause (1), does not apply to transfers completed under this subdivision. (c) If the transferee is prohibited by federal law from purchasing or possessing the firearm or not entitled under state law to possess the firearm, neither the federally licensed firearms dealer nor the transferor shall transfer the firearm to the transferee. (d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this section shall not prevent the transferor from: (1) removing the firearm from the premises of the federally licensed firearms dealer, or the gun show or event where the federally licensed firearms dealer is conducting business, as applicable, while the background check is being conducted, provided that the transferor must return to the federally licensed firearms dealer with the transferee before the transfer takes place, and the federally licensed firearms dealer must take possession of the firearm in order to complete the transfer; and (2) removing the firearm from the business premises of the federally licensed firearms dealer if the results of the background check indicate the transferee is prohibited by federal law from purchasing or possessing the firearm or not entitled under state law to possess the firearm. (e) A transferee who consents to participate in a transfer under this subdivision is not entitled to have the transfer report returned as provided for in section 624.7132, subdivision 10. (f) A firearms dealer may charge a reasonable fee for conducting a background check and facilitating a transfer between the transferor and transferee pursuant to this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Compulsory production of a record of transfer; misdemeanor penalty. (a) Unless a transfer was completed under subdivision 3, the transferor and transferee of a pistol deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end semiautomatic military-style assault weaponnew text begin , or large-capacity magazinenew text end transferred under subdivision 4 must produce the record of transfer when a peace officer requests the record as part of a criminal investigation. (b) A person who refuses or is unable to produce a record of transfer for deleted text begin a firearmdeleted text end new text begin an itemnew text end transferred under this section in response to a request for production made by a peace officer pursuant to paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor. A prosecution or conviction for violation of this subdivision is not a bar to conviction of, or punishment for, any other crime committed involving the transferred deleted text begin firearmdeleted text end new text begin itemnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7141, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Transfer prohibited. (a) A person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for up to two years and to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000 if the person intentionally transfers a firearmnew text begin or large-capacity magazinenew text end to another and the person knows or reasonably should know that the transferee: (1) has been denied a permit to carry under section 624.714 because the transferee is not eligible under section 624.713 to possess a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or any other firearm; (2) has been found ineligible to possess a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by a chief of police or sheriff as a result of an application for a transferee permit or a transfer report; or (3) is disqualified under section 624.713 from possessing a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or any other firearm. (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to the transfer of a firearm other than a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon to a person under the age of 18 who is not disqualified from possessing any other firearm. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7141, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Aggravated offense. A person who violates this section may be sentenced to imprisonment for up to five years and to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000 if the transferee possesses or uses the weaponnew text begin or large-capacity magazinenew text end within one year after the transfer in furtherance of a felony crime of violence. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7141, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Subsequent eligibility. This section is not applicable to a transfer to a person who became eligible to possess a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon under section 624.713 after the transfer occurred but before the transferee used or possessed the weaponnew text begin or large-capacity magazinenew text end in furtherance of any crime. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08619 256B.0625 COVERED SERVICES. Subd. 38. Payments for mental health services. Payments for mental health services covered under the medical assistance program that are provided by masters-prepared mental health professionals shall be 80 percent of the rate paid to doctoral-prepared professionals. Payments for mental health services covered under the medical assistance program that are provided by masters-prepared mental health professionals employed by community mental health centers shall be 100 percent of the rate paid to doctoral-prepared professionals. Payments for mental health services covered under the medical assistance program that are provided by physician assistants shall be 80.4 percent of the base rate paid to psychiatrists. 609.667 FIREARMS; REMOVAL OR ALTERATION OF SERIAL NUMBER. Whoever commits any of the following acts may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both: (1) obliterates, removes, changes, or alters the serial number or other identification of a firearm; (2) receives or possesses a firearm, the serial number or other identification of which has been obliterated, removed, changed, or altered; or (3) receives or possesses a firearm that is not identified by a serial number. As used in this section, "serial number or other identification" means the serial number and other information required under United States Code, title 26, section 5842, for the identification of firearms.